Georgia, session 2025_26, HB615.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act creating the Chatham County Recreation Authority, approved April 5, 1995
(Ga. L. 1995, p. 4281), is amended in Section 2 by revising subsections (b) and (h) as
follows:
"(b)(1) On July 1, 2025, and until February 28, 2029, the authority shall be governed by
a board that shall consist of no more than 14 members. As of March 1, 2029, the
authority shall be governed by a board that shall consist of nine members.
(2)(A) Those members of the authority serving on the effective date of this subsection
shall serve out the terms to which they were appointed; provided, however, that any
vacancy on the board:
H. B. 615 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 47 9005S
(i) Existing on the effective date of this subsection; or
(ii) Created by one or more of such members vacating his or her office prior to the
end of his or her term following the effective date of this subsection;
shall be filled by a member appointed by the Chatham County legislative delegation to
serve out the remainder of the unexpired term.
(B)(i) Upon the expiration of the term of board member Sandra Cason, the Board of
Commissioners of Chatham County shall appoint a member of the authority from a
list of nominees made by the Savannah Area Chamber of Commerce.
(ii) Upon the expiration of the term of board member Bob Fritz, the Board of
Commissioners of Chatham County shall appoint a member of the authority.
(iii) Upon the expiration of the term of any other member of the authority serving on
June 30, 2025, such board membership shall be abolished.
(3)(A) Except as provided for in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of this subsection,
members of the authority appointed by the legislative delegation shall serve two-year
terms of office and until their successors are appointed and qualified; provided,
however, that of the initial seven members appointed by the legislative delegation
pursuant to this subsection, the legislative delegation shall designate three of the initial
seven members to serve an initial term of one year and until their successors are
appointed and qualified.
(B) Members of the authority appointed by the Board of Commissioners of Chatham
County pursuant to divisions (2)(B)(i) and (2)(B)(ii) of this subsection shall serve
four-year terms of office and until their successors are appointed and qualified;
provided, however, that the initial member appointed pursuant to division (2)(B)(ii) of
this subsection shall be appointed to an initial term of office of three years and until his
or her successor is appointed and qualified.
H. B. 615 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 47 9005S
(4) For the purposes of this subsection, the Chatham County legislative delegation shall
be composed of all senators and representatives in the General Assembly whose districts
are wholly or partially in Chatham County."
"(h) A quorum of the authority shall be a majority of the board members authorized by this
Act. No vacancy on the authority shall impair the right of the quorum to exercise all of the
rights and perform all the duties of the authority."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 615 (SUB)
- 3 -